Illinois, session 104th, SB453.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Labor Relations Act is 5amended by changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 315/7)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1607)7    Sec. 7. Duty to bargain. A public employer and the 8exclusive representative have the authority and the duty to 9bargain collectively set forth in this Section.10    For the purposes of this Act, "to bargain collectively" 11means the performance of the mutual obligation of the public 12employer or his designated representative and the 13representative of the public employees to meet at reasonable 14times, including meetings in advance of the budget-making 15process, and to negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, 16hours, and other conditions of employment, not excluded by 17Section 4 of this Act, or the negotiation of an agreement, or 18any question arising thereunder and the execution of a written 19contract incorporating any agreement reached if requested by 20either party, but such obligation does not compel either party 21to agree to a proposal or require the making of a concession.22    The duty "to bargain collectively" shall also include an 23obligation to negotiate over any matter with respect to wages,   SB0453 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06694 SPS 16730 b1hours and other conditions of employment, not specifically 2provided for in any other law or not specifically in violation 3of the provisions of any law. If any other law pertains, in 4part, to a matter affecting the wages, hours and other 5conditions of employment, such other law shall not be 6construed as limiting the duty "to bargain collectively" and 7to enter into collective bargaining agreements containing 8clauses which either supplement, implement, or relate to the 9effect of such provisions in other laws.10    The duty "to bargain collectively" shall also include 11negotiations as to the terms of a collective bargaining 12agreement. The parties may, by mutual agreement, provide for 13arbitration of impasses resulting from their inability to 14agree upon wages, hours and terms and conditions of employment 15to be included in a collective bargaining agreement. Such 16arbitration provisions shall be subject to the Illinois 17"Uniform Arbitration Act" unless agreed by the parties.18    The duty "to bargain collectively" shall also mean that no 19party to a collective bargaining contract shall terminate or 20modify such contract, unless the party desiring such 21termination or modification:22        (1) serves a written notice upon the other party to 23    the contract of the proposed termination or modification 24    60 days prior to the expiration date thereof, or in the 25    event such contract contains no expiration date, 60 days 26    prior to the time it is proposed to make such termination   SB0453 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06694 SPS 16730 b1    or modification;2        (2) offers to meet and confer with the other party for 3    the purpose of negotiating a new contract or a contract 4    containing the proposed modifications;5        (3) notifies the Board within 30 days after such 6    notice of the existence of a dispute, provided no 7    agreement has been reached by that time; and8        (4) continues in full force and effect, without 9    resorting to strike or lockout, all the terms and 10    conditions of the existing contract for a period of 60 11    days after such notice is given to the other party or until 12    the expiration date of such contract, whichever occurs 13    later.14    The duties imposed upon employers, employees and labor 15organizations by paragraphs (2), (3) and (4) shall become 16inapplicable upon an intervening certification of the Board, 17under which the labor organization, which is a party to the 18contract, has been superseded as or ceased to be the exclusive 19representative of the employees pursuant to the provisions of 20subsection (a) of Section 9, and the duties so imposed shall 21not be construed as requiring either party to discuss or agree 22to any modification of the terms and conditions contained in a 23contract for a fixed period, if such modification is to become 24effective before such terms and conditions can be reopened 25under the provisions of the contract.26    Collective bargaining for home care and home health   SB0453 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06694 SPS 16730 b1workers who function as personal assistants and individual 2maintenance home health workers under the Home Services 3Program shall be limited to the terms and conditions of 4employment under the State's control, as defined in Public Act 593-204 or this amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly, as 6applicable. 7    Collective bargaining for child and day care home 8providers under the child care assistance program shall be 9limited to the terms and conditions of employment under the 10State's control, as defined in this amendatory Act of the 94th 11General Assembly. 12    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 13whenever collective bargaining is for the purpose of 14establishing an initial agreement following original 15certification of units with fewer than 35 employees, with 16respect to public employees other than peace officers, fire 17fighters, and security employees, the following apply:18        (1) Not later than 10 days after receiving a written 19    request for collective bargaining from a labor 20    organization that has been newly certified as a 21    representative as defined in Section 6(c), or within such 22    further period as the parties agree upon, the parties 23    shall meet and commence to bargain collectively and shall 24    make every reasonable effort to conclude and sign a 25    collective bargaining agreement.26        (2) If anytime after the expiration of the 90-day   SB0453 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06694 SPS 16730 b1    period beginning on the date on which bargaining is 2    commenced the parties have failed to reach an agreement, 3    either party may notify the Illinois Public Labor 4    Relations Board of the existence of a dispute and request 5    mediation in accordance with the provisions of Section 14 6    of this Act.7        (3) If after the expiration of the 30-day period 8    beginning on the date on which mediation commenced, or 9    such additional period as the parties may agree upon, the 10    mediator is not able to bring the parties to agreement by 11    conciliation, either the exclusive representative of the 12    employees or the employer may request of the other, in 13    writing, arbitration and shall submit a copy of the 14    request to the board. Upon submission of the request for 15    arbitration, the parties shall be required to participate 16    in the impasse arbitration procedures set forth in Section 17    14 of this Act, except the right to strike shall not be 18    considered waived pursuant to Section 17 of this Act, 19    until the actual convening of the arbitration hearing. 20(Source: P.A. 97-1158, eff. 1-29-13; 98-1004, eff. 8-18-14.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.